Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-344
Parts vehicle, defined.

Parts vehicle means a vehicle
or trailer the title to which has been surrendered (1) in accordance
with subdivision (1)(a) of section 60-169 or (2) to any other state by the
owner of the vehicle or an insurance company to render the vehicle fit for
sale for scrap and parts only.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 44;

Laws 2011, LB241, § 5.